California statutes. Education Code
Article 2 (commencing with Section 10340) of Chapter 4 of Part 7, Articles 1 to 5, inclusive (commencing with Section 45100), Article 7 (commencing with Section 45340), and the applicable provisions of Sections 44047, 44048, Article 1 (commencing with Section 7000) of Chapter 1, Article 1 (commencing with Section 7100) of Chapter 2 of Part 5, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 44000) shall apply to all classified employees of a school district, including those authorized in Sections 35025, 35041, and 35045, whether a merit or nonmerit system district as authorized by this chapter unless the section specifically limits its application to nonmerit system districts. These provisions shall also apply to all persons who are part of the classified service who are employed by the county superintendent of schools, or any division thereof, and whose salaries are paid out of the county school service fund regardless of the origin of the fund moneys, and to all persons employed by any entity, including a regional occupational center or program, created or established by any two or more school districts pursuant to statute, including Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7450) of Division 6, exercising any joint power pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, or as otherwise conferred by law upon such districts.

These provisions shall not apply to employees of a school district lying wholly within a city and county which provides in its charter for a merit system of employment for employees employed in positions not requiring certification qualifications except that, commencing July 1, 1992, the governing board of that district may adopt a resolution to make these provisions applicable to persons employed as paraprofessionals as defined in Section 44671.5, who have not attained permanent status under the merit system as of that date. 

The positions authorized in Sections 35025, 35041, and 35045 may, by resolution of a governing board, be exempted from the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 287, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

45100.5.

(a) The governing board of a school district may adopt a resolution designating certain positions as senior management of the classified service. Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the decision of the governing board shall not be deemed a matter subject to negotiation, but shall be subject to review by the Public Employment Relations Board.

(b) Employees whose positions are designated as senior management of the classified service shall be a part of the classified service and shall be afforded all rights, benefits, and burdens of other classified employees, except that they shall be exempt from all provisions relating to obtaining permanent status in a senior management position.

(c) Notice of reassignment or dismissal from a position in the senior management of the classified service shall be provided in accordance with the provisions of Section 35031.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 70.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

45101.

Definitions as used in this chapter:

(a) “Classification” means that each position in the classified service shall have a designated title, a regular minimum number of assigned hours per day, days per week, and months per year, a specific statement of the duties required to be performed by the employees in each such position, and the regular monthly salary ranges for each such position.

(b) “Permanent” as used in the phrase “permanent employee” includes tenure in the classification in which the employee passed the required probationary period, and includes all of the incidents of that classification.

(c) “Regular” as used in the phrase “regular classified employee” or any similar phrase, refers to a classified employee who has probationary or permanent status.

(d) “Demotion” means assignment to an inferior position or status, without the employee’s written voluntary consent.

(e) “Disciplinary action” includes any action whereby an employee is deprived of any classification or any incident of any classification in which he has permanence, including dismissal, suspension, demotion, or any reassignment, without his voluntary consent, except a layoff for lack of work or lack of funds.

(f) “Reclassification” means the upgrading of a position to a higher classification as a result of the gradual increase of the duties being performed by the incumbent in such position.

(g) “Layoff for lack of funds or layoff for lack of work” includes any reduction in hours of employment or assignment to a class or grade lower than that in which the employee has permanence, voluntarily consented to by the employee, in order to avoid interruption of employment by layoff.

(h) “Cause” relating to disciplinary actions against classified employees means those grounds for discipline, or offenses, enumerated in the law or the written rules of a public school employer. No disciplinary action may be maintained for any “cause” other than as defined herein.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to school districts to which the provisions of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter are applicable.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to any school district which, during the 1973–74 school year, had an average daily attendance of 100,000 or more.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45102.

(a) For the purposes of this section every classified employee shall be deemed to be employed for 12 months during each school year regardless of the number of months in which he or she is normally in paid status.

(b) If, during a school year, it is necessary to assign a regular classified employee to perform an assignment or service in addition to his or her regular assignment, a school district shall pay the classified employee on a pro rata basis for the additional assignment or service, not less than the compensation and benefits that are applicable to the classification of the additional assignment or service during the school year, unless the school district has negotiated a contract that allows for a lesser pay scale. A school district shall inform a classified employee of the compensation and benefits of the additional assignment or service before the employee commences the additional assignment or service.

(c) A school district that, in any school year, maintains school sessions at times other than during the regular September–June academic year shall assign for service during those times regular classified employees of the district. 

(d) If it is necessary to assign classified employees not regularly so assigned to serve between the end of one academic year and the commencement of another, that assignment shall be made on the basis of qualifications for employment in each classification of service that is required.

(1) A school district may not require a classified employee whose regular yearly assignment for service excludes all, or any part of, the period between the end of the academic year in June to the beginning of the next academic year in September to perform services during that period.

(2) A classified employee shall, for services performed as provided in this subdivision, receive, on a pro rata basis, not less than the compensation and benefits that are applicable to the classification of the additional assignment or service during the regular academic year.

(e) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

45103.

(a) The governing board of a school district shall employ persons for positions not requiring certification qualifications. The governing board of a school district shall, except where Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) or Section 45318 applies, classify all of these employees and positions. The employees and positions shall be known as the classified service.

(b) (1) Substitute and short-term employees, employed and paid for less than 75 percent of a school year, shall not be a part of the classified service.

(2) Apprentices and professional experts employed on a temporary basis for a specific project, regardless of length of
 employment, shall not be a part of the classified service.

(3) Full-time students employed part time, and part-time students employed part time in any college workstudy program, or in a work experience education program conducted by a community college district pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 51760) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 and that is financed by state or federal funds, shall not be a part of the classified service.

(c) Unless otherwise permitted, a person whose position does not require certification qualifications shall not be employed by a governing board of a school district, except as authorized by this section.

(d) As used in this section:

(1) “Substitute employee” means a person employed to replace a classified employee who is
 temporarily absent from duty. In addition, if the school district is then engaged in a procedure to hire a permanent employee to fill a vacancy in any classified position, the governing board of the school district may fill the vacancy through the employment, for not more than 60 calendar days, of one or more substitute employees, except to the extent that a collective bargaining agreement then in effect provides for a different period of time.

(2) “Short-term employee” means a person who is employed to perform a service for the school district, upon the completion of which, the service required or similar services will not be extended or needed on a continuing basis. Before employing a short-term employee, the governing board of a school district, at a regularly scheduled board meeting, shall specify the service required to be performed by the employee pursuant to the definition of “classification” in subdivision (a) of Section 45101, and
 shall certify the ending date of the service. The ending date may be shortened or extended by the governing board of a school district, but shall not extend beyond 75 percent of a school year.

(3) “Seventy-five percent of a school year” means 195 working days, including holidays, sick leave, vacation, and other leaves of absence, irrespective of number of hours worked per day.

(e) Employment of either full-time or part-time students in any college workstudy program, or in a work experience education program, shall not result in the displacement of classified personnel or impair existing contracts for services.

(f) This section shall apply only to school districts not incorporating the merit system as outlined in Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 582, Sec. 1.   (AB 670)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

45103.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, personal services contracting for all services currently or customarily performed by classified school employees to achieve cost savings is permissible, unless otherwise prohibited, when all the following conditions are met:

(1) The governing board or contracting agency clearly demonstrates that the proposed contract will result in actual overall cost savings to the school district, provided that:

(A) In comparing costs, there shall be included the school district’s additional cost of providing the same service as proposed by a contractor. These additional costs
 shall include the salaries and benefits of additional staff that would be needed and the cost of additional space, equipment, and materials needed to perform the function.

(B) In comparing costs, there shall not be included the school district’s indirect overhead costs unless these costs can be attributed solely to the function in question and would not exist if that function was not performed by the school district. Indirect overhead costs shall mean the pro rata share of existing administrative salaries and benefits, rent, equipment costs, utilities, and materials.

(C) In comparing costs, there shall be included in the cost of a contractor providing a service any continuing school district costs that would be directly associated with the contracted function. These continuing school district costs shall include, but not be limited to, those for inspection, supervision, and
 monitoring.

(2) Proposals to contract out work shall not be approved solely on the basis that savings will result from lower contractor pay rates or benefits. Proposals to contract out work shall be eligible for approval if the contractor’s wages are at the industry’s level and do not undercut school district pay rates.

(3) The contract does not cause the displacement of school district employees. The term “displacement” includes layoff, demotion, involuntary transfer to a new classification, involuntary transfer to a new location requiring a change of residence, and time base reductions. Displacement does not include changes in shifts or days off, nor does it include reassignment to other positions within the same classification and general location or employment with the contractor, so long as wages and benefits are comparable to those paid by the school district.

(4) The savings shall be large enough to ensure that they will not be eliminated by private sector and district cost fluctuations that could normally be expected during the contracting period.

(5) The amount of savings clearly justify the size and duration of the contracting agreement.

(6) The contract is awarded through a publicized, competitive bidding process.

(7) The contract includes specific provisions pertaining to the qualifications of the staff that will perform the work under the contract, as well as assurance that the contractor’s hiring practices meet applicable nondiscrimination standards.

(8) The potential for future economic risk to the school district from potential contractor
 rate increases is minimal.

(9) The contract is with a firm. A “firm” means a corporation, limited liability company, partnership, nonprofit organization, or sole proprietorship.

(10) The potential economic advantage of contracting is not outweighed by the public’s interest in having a particular function performed directly by the school district.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, personal services contracting shall also be permissible when any of the following conditions can be met:

(1) The contract is for new school district functions and the Legislature has specifically mandated or authorized the performance of the work by independent contractors.

(2) The services
 contracted are not available within the district, cannot be performed satisfactorily by school district employees, or are of such a highly specialized or technical nature that the necessary expert knowledge, experience, and ability are not available through the school district.

(3) The services are incidental to a contract for the purchase or lease of real or personal property. Contracts under this criterion, known as “service agreements,” shall include, but not be limited to, agreements to service or maintain office equipment or computers that are leased or rented.

(4) The policy, administrative, or legal goals and purposes of the district cannot be accomplished through the utilization of persons selected pursuant to the regular or ordinary school district hiring process. Contracts are permissible under this criterion to protect against a conflict of interest or to ensure
 independent and unbiased findings in cases where there is a clear need for a different, outside perspective. These contracts shall include, but not be limited to, obtaining expert witnesses in litigation.

(5) The nature of the work is such that the criteria for emergency appointments apply. “Emergency appointment” means an appointment made for a period not to exceed 60 working days either during an actual emergency to prevent the stoppage of public business or because of the limited duration of the work. The method of selection and the qualification standards for an emergency employee shall be determined by the district. The frequency of appointment, length of employment, and the circumstances appropriate for the appointment of firms or individuals under emergency appointments shall be restricted so as to prevent the use of emergency appointments to circumvent the regular or ordinary hiring process.

(6) The contractor will provide equipment, materials, facilities, or support services that could not feasibly be provided by the school district in the location where the services are to be performed.

(7) The services are of such an urgent, temporary, or occasional nature that the delay incumbent in their implementation under the district’s regular or ordinary hiring process would frustrate their very purpose.

(c) This section shall apply to all school districts, including districts that have adopted the merit system.

(d) This section shall apply to personal service contracts entered into after January 1, 2003. This section shall not apply to the renewal of personal services contracts subsequent to January 1, 2003, where the contract was entered into before
 January 1, 2003, irrespective of whether the contract is renewed or rebid with the existing contractor or with a new contractor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 43.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

45103.5.

All contracts for management consulting services relating to food service shall be governed by this section.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 39902, 45103, 45104, and 45256, any school district may enter into a contract for management consulting services relating to food service for a term not to exceed one year. Any renewal of that contract, or further requests for proposals to provide food service management consulting services, shall be considered on a year-to-year basis. A contract for food service management consulting services shall not cause or result in the elimination of any food service classified personnel or position. A contract for food service management consulting services shall not cause or result in any adverse effect upon any food service classified personnel or position with respect to wages, benefits, or other terms and conditions of employment.

(b) A contract made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not provide for or result in the supervision of food service classified personnel by the food service management consultant. This section shall not be construed to prevent an entity providing food service management consulting services from interacting or consulting with the food service manager or director, supervisors, or food service classified employees of a school district on matters relating to food services except those prohibited by subdivision (a).

(c) Sections 45122, 45123, 45124, 45125, 45125.5, and 45126, and any other health criteria established by the school district, are applicable to all persons providing food service management consulting services under this section.

(d) This section shall apply to all school districts, including districts that have adopted the merit system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 826 [Sec. 1].   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45104.

Every position not defined by this code as a position requiring certification qualifications and not specifically exempted from the classified service according to the provisions of Section 45103 or 45256 shall be classified as required by those sections and shall be a part of the classified service. Such positions may not be designated as certificated nor shall the assignment of a title to any such a position remove the position from the classified service, nor shall possession of a certification document be made a requirement for employment in any such position.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the employment of any individual in a position described by this section as part of the classified service who is in possession of certification qualifications, nor shall the possession of certification qualifications be grounds for the elimination of an individual for consideration for employment in such a position.

This section shall apply to districts which have adopted the merit system in the same manner and with the same effect as though it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45104.5.

The governing board of a school district may adopt a resolution abolishing any or all positions of the senior management of the classified service. An employee occupying a senior management position abolished by the action shall become a member of the classified or certificated service in a position to which he or she would otherwise be entitled if the employee had not been a member of the senior management of the classified service.

If the employee in the senior management of the classified service had been a member of the regular classified or certificated service, he or she shall be entitled to a position which is the same as, or similar to, the position to which he or she holds rights outside of the senior management of the classified service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 71.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

45105.

(a) Positions not requiring certification qualifications created by a governing board of a school district under the Manpower Development and Training Act of 1962, the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964, the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, or Section 11300 or Section 13650 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, any future federal or state legislative enactment, or any other special funding, and which are not a part of the regular school program shall, nevertheless, be a part of the classified service as established by Section 45103 or 45256.

Persons employed in these positions shall be classified employees and shall enjoy all of the rights, burdens and benefits accorded other classified employees. Their selection and retention shall be made on the same basis as that of persons selected for positions that are a part of the regular school program.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if specially funded positions are restricted to employment of persons in low-income groups, from designated impoverished areas or other criteria which restricts the privilege of all citizens to compete for employment in the positions, all these positions shall, in addition to the regular class title, be classified as “restricted.” Their selection and retention shall be made on the same basis as that of persons selected and retained in positions that are a part of the regular school program, except that persons employed in the following categories of restricted positions shall not be subject to Section 45272 or 45273:

(A) The position of instructional aide, as defined in Section 45343.

(B) Any other position involving personal contacts with pupils or parents that is established to assist school-staff personnel responsible for school-community relations; educational support services for such areas as counseling, library or health; or the correction or prevention of behavioral problems.

(2) Persons employed in positions properly classified as “restricted” shall be classified employees for all purposes except:

(A) They shall not be accorded employment permanency under Section 45113 or 45301, whichever is applicable.

(B) They shall not acquire seniority credits for the purposes of Sections 45298 and 45308 or, in a district not having the merit (civil service) system, for the purposes of layoff for lack of work or lack of funds as may be established by rule of the governing board.

(C) Sections 45287 and 45289 shall not apply to “restricted” employees.

(D) They shall not be eligible for promotion into the regular classified service or, in districts that have adopted the merit system, shall not be subject to the provisions of Section 45241, until they have complied with the provisions of subdivision (c).

(c) At any time, after completion of six months of satisfactory service, a person serving in a “restricted” position shall be given the opportunity to take qualifying examinations that are required for all other persons serving in the same class in the regular classified service. If the person satisfactorily completes the qualifying examination, regardless of final numerical listing on an eligibility list, he or she shall be accorded full rights, benefits and burdens of any other classified employee serving in the regular classified service. His or her service in the regular classified service shall be counted from the original date of employment in the “restricted” position and shall continue even though he or she continues to serve in a “restricted” position.

(d) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to clearly set forth that positions normally a part of the classified service are included in the classified service regardless of the source of income to sustain the positions and to effectively implement specially funded programs intended to provide job opportunities for untrained and impoverished persons but to do so in a manner that will not be disruptive nor detrimental to the normal employment procedures relating to classified school service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   Effective February 22, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

45106.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 45103 or Section 45256, which exempt certain types of positions or categories of personnel from the classified service of a school district, persons serving in exempt positions or who serve in classified positions but are exempted from the classified service shall, nevertheless, be subject to the provisions of Sections 45122 to 45125, inclusive, and Section 49406. The governing board of every school district shall, by rule or regulation, provide for the implementation of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to full-time day students regularly attending in the district of employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45107.

(a) The “act” as used in this section shall mean the Federal Emergency Employment Act of 1971 (Public Law 92-54) or any similar federal law hereafter enacted to provide transitional employment in public service positions for unemployed or underemployed persons.

(b) Funds derived from the act shall not be expended for work that: (1) would otherwise have been performed at federal, state, or local expense; (2) will not result in an increase over the employment which would otherwise be available; (3) which will result in the displacement of permanent members of the classified service (including partial displacement, such as reduction in the hours of nonovertime work or wages or employment benefits); (4) or which will impair existing rights of permanent members of the classified service.

(c) If during the term of a contract or renewal thereof, executed under the act, a school district is engaged in layoffs for lack of work or lack of funds of permanent classified employees serving in regular positions and is employing personnel or contemplates employing personnel in like or reasonably similar positions under the act, a report shall be submitted by the superintendent of schools to the governing board clearly demonstrating and substantiating the fact that the duties being performed by the permanent employees in regular positions who are being laid off will not be performed by personnel employed under the act.

Approval of the report by the governing board shall constitute its acceptance of the facts, as contained therein, and based thereon its affirmation of compliance with the contract executed under the act and this section.

This section shall apply to districts which have adopted the merit system in the same manner and with the same effect as though it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45108.

If the governing board of any school district establishes positions in the categories described below and restricts initial appointments of new employees to persons in low-income groups or residing in specifically designated areas of the community, then such positions shall, in addition to the regular class title, be classified as “restricted.” The positions shall be part of the classified service and persons so employed shall be classified employees for all purposes except that (1) they shall not be subject to the provisions of Section 45272 or 45273, and (2) they shall not acquire permanent status or seniority credit and shall not be eligible for promotion into the regular classified service until they have complied with the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 45105.

The categories of positions for which the governing board may establish restrictions under this section are:

(a) The position of instructional aide, as defined in Section 45343.

(b) Any other position involving personal contacts with pupils or parents, that is established to assist school staff personnel responsible for school-community relations; educational support services for such areas as counseling, library, or health; or the correction or prevention of behavioral problems.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1388, Sec. 7.   Effective September 24, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

45108.5.

(a) Senior management employee means either of the following:

(1) An employee in the highest position in a principal district program area, as determined by the governing board, which does not require certification qualifications, and which has districtwide responsibility for formulating policies or administering the program area.

(2) An employee who acts as the fiscal advisor to the district superintendent. 

(b) The maximum number of positions which may be designated as senior management positions shall be as follows:

(1) For districts with less than 10,000 units of average daily attendance, two positions.

(2) For districts with 10,000 to 25,000 units of average daily attendance, inclusive, three positions.

(3) For districts with 25,001 to 50,000 units of average daily attendance, inclusive, 4 positions.

(4) For districts with more than 50,000 units of average daily attendance, 5 positions.

(c) This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240), as well as to districts which have not adopted the merit system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 72.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

45108.7.

The governing board of a school district may apply to the State Board of Education to waive the provisions of Section 45108.5 for purposes of expanding the number and type of senior management positions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 73.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

45109.

Governing boards shall fix and prescribe the duties to be performed by all persons in the classified service and other positions not requiring certification qualifications of the school district, except those persons employed as a part of a personnel commission staff as provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45110.

Classified employees shall not be required to perform duties which are not fixed and prescribed for the position by the governing board in accordance with Section 45109, unless the duties reasonably relate to those fixed for the position by the board, for any period of time which exceeds five working days within a 15-calendar-day period except as authorized herein.

An employee may be required to perform duties inconsistent with those assigned to the position by the governing board for a period of more than five working days provided that his salary is adjusted upward for the entire period he is required to work out of classification and in such amounts as will reasonably reflect the duties required to be performed outside his normal assigned duties.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a personnel commission and governing board, or a governing board in a nonmerit system district, may, by written rule, provide for an upward salary adjustment for any classified employee required to work out of classification for any period of time less than that required herein.

It is the intent of this section to permit school districts to temporarily work employees outside of their normal duties but in so doing to require that some additional compensation be provided the employee during such temporary assignments.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45111.

No school district may adopt or maintain any rule or regulation which requires a candidate for a position in the classified service to be a resident of the district or to become a resident of the district, or which requires that an employee maintain residency within the district; nor may a district grant preferential points or other preferential treatment to those candidates or employees who are residents of the district. This section shall not apply to restricted positions as provided for in Sections 45105 and 45103.

The Legislature in enacting this section recognizes that the public school system of this state is the property of all its citizens, and that all qualified candidates for positions in the classified service, regardless of residence, should be granted the opportunity to compete for and obtain such positions based solely on merit and fitness.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45112.

If the governing board of any school district employs staff assistants or field representatives to directly assist the governing board or individual governing board members in carrying out their policymaking duties, such assistants or representatives shall be members of the classified service, except that such assistants or representatives shall be exempt from all provisions of this code relating to obtaining a permanent status in any position in the district, and procedures pertaining to the recruitment, appointment, classification, and salary of members of the classified service.

Staff assistants shall serve at the pleasure of a majority of the governing board, and each field representative appointed by the governing board to assist an individual member shall serve at the pleasure of such member.

It is the intent of the Legislature that persons employed under Section 45112 will not be utilized for election campaigns of board members during hours of their employment.

This section shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45113.

(a) The governing board of a school district shall prescribe written rules and regulations governing the personnel management of the classified service. These written rules and regulations shall be printed and made available to employees in the classified service, the public, and those concerned with the administration of this section, whereby these employees are designated as permanent employees of the school district after serving a prescribed period of probation that shall not exceed six months or 130 days of paid service, whichever is longer. However, a full-time peace officer or public safety dispatcher employed by a school district operating a dispatch center certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, to be designated
 as a permanent employee of the school district, shall serve a probationary period of not less than one year of paid service from their date of appointment to that full-time position. A permanent employee who accepts a promotion and fails to complete the probationary period for that promotional position, shall be employed in the classification from which the employee was promoted.

(b) An employee designated as a permanent employee shall be subject to disciplinary action only for cause as prescribed by rule or regulation of the governing board of the school district, but the governing board’s determination of the sufficiency of the cause for disciplinary action shall be conclusive.

(c) The governing board of a school district shall adopt rules of procedure for disciplinary proceedings
 that shall contain a provision for informing the employee by written notice of the specific charges against the employee, a statement of the employee’s right to a hearing on those charges, and the time within which the hearing may be requested that shall be not less than five days after service of the notice to the employee, and a card or paper, the signing and filing of which shall constitute a demand for hearing, and a denial of all charges. The burden of proof shall remain with the governing board of the school district, and any rule or regulation to the contrary is void.

(d) Disciplinary action shall not be taken for any cause that arose before the employee’s becoming permanent, nor for any cause that arose more than two years preceding the date of the filing of the notice of cause unless the cause was concealed or not disclosed
 by the employee when it could be reasonably assumed that the employee should have disclosed the facts to the employing school district.
